District of Columbia statutes.
34-905

Production of records of utilities; attendance of witnesses; duties of United States Attorney and D.C. Attorney General.

(a)

The Commission may require, by order or subpoena, to be served upon any public utility in the same manner that a summons is served in a civil action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, the production within the District of Columbia at such time and place as it may designate of any books, accounts, papers, or records kept by such public utility in any office or place without the District of Columbia, or verified copies in lieu thereof, if the Commission shall so order, in order that an examination thereof may be made by the Commission under its direction. Any public utility failing or refusing to comply with any order or subpoena shall for each day it shall so fail or refuse forfeit and pay to the District of Columbia the sum of $100, to be recovered in an action to be brought in the name of said District.

(b)

Attendance of witnesses and the production of such documentary evidence may be required from any place in the United States. And in case of disobedience to a subpoena the Commission, or any party to a proceeding before the Commission may invoke the aid of any court of the United States or the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of books, papers, and documents under the provisions of this section. And the said Commission is hereby given power to call on any United States Attorney, the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia or any counsel of the Commission to enforce the provisions of this subtitle in the proper courts of the United States, and on such call it shall be the duty of the said United States Attorney, Corporation Counsel, or any counsel of the Commission, upon request of said Commission, to enforce the provisions of this section, the cost and expenses incurred to be paid out of the appropriations for the expenses of the courts of the United States.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 982, ch. 150, § 8, par. 35
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 909, 991, ch. 646, §§ 1, 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(39)(B)
1973 Ed., § 43-405.
1981 Ed., § 43-605.
Utility records, requirements, see § 34-1109 et seq.
Utility failure to disclose, fraud, fines and penalties, see § 34-705.